North Dakota statutes. TITLE 15.1 Elementary and Secondary Education
CHAPTER 15.1-26 Adult Education

15.1-26-01.
Definitions — Adult and adult basic and secondary education.

For purposes of this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Adult” means any individual who is beyond the age of compulsory school attendance.

“Adult basic and secondary education” means:

Instructional services for adults who:

Do not have the basic literacy skills necessary to function effectively in society;

Do not have a certificate of graduation from a school providing secondary education; or

Have not reached a level of education equivalent to that required for a certificate of graduation to be issued.

Education for adults whose inability to speak, read, or write English is a substantial impairment of their ability to obtain or retain employment commensurate with their ability.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 196, § 16.

15.1-26-02.
Adult basic and secondary education programs — Coordination.

The superintendent of public instruction shall coordinate adult basic and secondary education programs and shall administer state and federal funding for the programs.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 196, § 16.

15.1-26-03.
Adult basic and secondary education programs — Availability.

The board of a school district may make adult basic and secondary education programs available to any individual over sixteen years of age who is unable to attend the public schools of the district.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 196, § 16.

15.1-26-04.
Funding for adult basic and secondary education programs.

The board of a school district may use school district funds to aid and promote adult basic and secondary education programs and may charge a reasonable fee for enrollment in such programs.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 196, § 16.

15.1-26-05.
General equivalency diplomas — Copies.

The superintendent of public instruction may charge up to three dollars for each general equivalency diploma issued, up to ten dollars for each copy of a general equivalency diploma, and up to two dollars for each copy of a transcript belonging to an individual pursuing a general equivalency diploma. The superintendent shall forward any money generated under this section to the state treasurer for deposit in the revolving printing fund in the state treasury and may expend the money to cover costs associated with the administration of the general equivalency diploma program.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 196, § 16.

15.1-26-06.
General educational development test results — Confidentiality.

The results of general educational development tests maintained by the superintendent of public instruction are confidential and are not open for public inspection. This section does not prohibit the superintendent of public instruction from making an individual’s test results available at the written request of the individual.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 196, § 16.

15.1-26-07.
Adult basic and secondary education fund — Continuing appropriation.

The superintendent of public instruction may receive and accept money from any public or private source for adult basic and secondary education programs. Any money received for adult basic and secondary education programs but not specifically appropriated by the legislative assembly must be deposited in the adult basic and secondary education fund in the state treasury. All money in the fund, and any interest upon moneys in the fund, is appropriated to the superintendent of public instruction for the purpose of administering and implementing adult basic and secondary education programs. Any funds appropriated under this section are not subject to section 54-44.1-11.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 196, § 16.